Vermont, session 2025-2026, H188.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. MOTOR VEHICLE PURCHASE CANCELLATION; STUDY
COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Motor Vehicle Purchase Cancellation
Study Committee to examine the possibility of amending Vermont’s laws to
permit persons to cancel or rescind the purchase of a motor vehicle under
certain circumstances.
VT LEG #380254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.188
2025 Page 2 of 4
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee;
(2) the Secretary of Transportation or designee;
(3) the Commissioner for Children and Families or designee;
(4) the Commissioner of Financial Regulation or designee;
(5) the Attorney General or designee;
(6) the Managing Director of the Vermont Vehicle and Automotive
Distributors Association or designee; and
(7) a member appointed by Vermont Legal Aid.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall examine the possibility of
amending Vermont’s laws to permit persons to cancel or rescind the purchase
of a motor vehicle under certain circumstances, including the following issues:
(1) the legal rights for motor vehicle purchasers in Vermont to:
(A) return a motor vehicle after it has been purchased and the
purchaser has taken possession of the vehicle; and
(B) cancel a contract to purchase a motor vehicle prior to delivery of
the vehicle;
(2) potential changes to Vermont’s statutes to permit a motor vehicle
purchaser to:
VT LEG #380254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.188
2025 Page 3 of 4
(A) return a motor vehicle after it has been purchased and the
purchaser has taken possession of the vehicle; and
(B) cancel a contract to purchase a motor vehicle prior to delivery of
the vehicle; and
(3) potential impacts on both motor vehicle purchasers and motor
vehicle dealerships of the statutory changes identified pursuant to subdivision
(2) of this subsection.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2026, the Committee shall submit a
written report to the House Committee on Transportation and the Senate
Committee on Transportation with its findings and any recommendations for
legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall call the first meeting of
the Committee to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall be the chair of the
Committee.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on February 15, 2026.
VT LEG #380254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.188
2025 Page 4 of 4
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Committee who
are not otherwise compensated for their attendance at meetings shall be entitled
to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than four meetings. These payments shall be
made from monies appropriated to Agency of Transportation.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380254 v.1